Illinois, session 104th, SB1394.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Household Hazardous Waste Stewardship Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7    (1) It is in the best interest of the State of Illinois for 8manufacturers of products for household use that contain 9hazardous substances to assume responsibility for the 10development, financing, and implementation of a statewide 11stewardship program that conveniently serves all areas of the 12State for the collection and environmentally sound management 13of waste from those products. There are hundreds of products 14purchased by consumers that contain hazardous substances, 15including, but not limited to, aerosol products, fertilizers, 16herbicides, pesticides, fluorescent lamps, furniture stripper 17and varnish, gasoline, kerosene, used oil, antifreeze, 18electronic cigarettes, household cleaners, solvent cleaners, 19and pool or hot tub chemicals. 20    (2) Improper management and disposal of household 21hazardous waste is a threat to public health and the 22environment. 23    (3) In 1991, the need for household hazardous waste   SB1394- 2 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1collection programs throughout the State was recognized and 2the Household Hazardous Waste Collection Act was enacted. 3Since then, the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency and 4local governments have worked together to support collection 5events and develop 5 permanent household hazardous waste 6collection facilities. However, these existing services do not 7provide convenient collection services statewide, and the cost 8of these programs for the Agency and local governments exceeds 9$6,000,000 annually. 10    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:11    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 12Agency. 13    "Agency contractor" means the company under a contractual 14agreement with the Agency to provide transportation and final 15disposition of covered products collected by collection sites. 16    "Antifreeze" means propylene glycol or ethylene glycol, 17including aggregated batches of propylene glycol or ethylene 18glycol, used as a heat transfer medium in an internal 19combustion engine; heating, ventilating, and air conditioning 20units; and electronics cooling applications; or used for 21winterizing equipment. 22    "Brand" means a name, symbols, words, or marks that 23identify a covered product and attribute the product to the 24owner of the brand as the manufacturer. 25    "Collection cost" means costs related to the collection of   SB1394- 3 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1covered products, including, but not limited to, facility 2siting costs; facility permitting costs; facility construction 3costs; facility maintenance costs; equipment costs; fork lift 4costs; truck costs; labor and benefits; costs for supplies, 5including traffic control devices, test kits for unknown 6waste, tape, plastic sheeting, and spill clean-up kits; 7building and equipment maintenance costs; event costs, 8including marketing costs; third-party contractor costs, 9including event set-up costs; environmental service fees; 10insurance fees; costs for shipping containers and materials; 11pallet costs; and personal protective equipment costs. 12    "Collection site" means a permanent facility permitted by 13the Agency to accept, manage, and store covered products or a 14location where a one-day collection event is held to collect 15covered products which are then transported offsite for proper 16management. 17    "Covered entity" means any person who presents a covered 18product to a collection site from that person's use at a 19household, with the exception of large quantity generators, 20small quantity generators, or very small quantity generators. 21    "Covered product" means any product offered for retail 22sale for household use contained in the receptacle in which 23the product is offered for retail sale, except for used oil, 24antifreeze, gasoline, and kerosene, if the product has any of 25the following characteristics: 26        (1) the physical properties of the product meet the   SB1394- 4 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    criteria for characteristic wastes under the federal 2    Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. 3    6901 et seq., including ignitability, corrosivity, 4    reactivity or toxicity as defined in 40 CFR 261.20 to 5    261.24; 6        (2) the physical properties of the product meet the 7    criteria for designation as a class 2, 3, 4, 5, 6 or 8 8    hazardous material, as defined in 49 CFR 173, by the 9    United States Department of Transportation under the 10    Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1975, 49 U.S.C. 11    5101 et seq.; or 12        (3) the product requires registration under the 13    Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 14    U.S.C. 136. 15    "Covered product" includes: 16        (1) automotive fluids, including household "do it 17    yourselfer" used oil, as defined in 35 Ill. Adm. Code 18    739.100, and antifreeze; and 19        (2) a product added by rule under Section 70 of this 20    Act. 21    "Covered product" does not include: 22        (1) a covered battery, as defined in the Portable and 23    Medium-Format Battery Stewardship Act; 24        (2) a drug, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 321(g)(1); a 25    biological product, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 262(i); a 26    device, as defined by 21 U.S.C. 3231(h)(1); or any   SB1394- 5 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    combination of those items; 2        (3) products sold for commercial agricultural use that 3    require registration under the Federal Insecticide, 4    Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. 136; 5        (4) architectural paint or any other covered product, 6    as defined in the Paint Stewardship Act; 7        (5) a covered electronic device, as defined in the 8    Consumer Electronics Recycling Act; 9        (6) a vitamin or dietary supplement; 10        (7) a liquefied petroleum or other gas container, 11    cylinder or receptacle; 12        (8) a fire extinguisher; 13        (9) an oil filter; 14        (10) a smoke detector, ionizing type; 15        (11) ammunition, fireworks, explosives projectile 16    marine flares; 17        (12) potentially infectious medical waste, as defined 18    in Section 3.360 of the Illinois Environmental Protection 19    Act; 20        (13) electronic cigarettes, as defined in the 21    Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age 22    and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, and 23    their apparatuses, including, but not limited to, vape 24    pods; 25        (14) an antimicrobial product that requires 26    registration under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and   SB1394- 6 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. 136, and is labeled in 2    accordance with federal requirements for pesticide 3    products intended for household use only; and 4        (15) a product that is subtracted by rule under 5    Section 70 of this Act. 6    "Disposal cost" means the costs related to the final 7disposition of the collected covered products. 8    "Environmental justice community" means environmental 9justice community, as defined in the Illinois Solar for All 10Program, as that definition is updated from time to time by the 11Illinois Power Agency and the Administrator of the Illinois 12Solar for All Program. 13    "Environmentally sound management" means management 14practices implemented in a manner that is designed to protect 15public health, safety, and the environment, including, but not 16limited to: 17        (1) adequate recordkeeping; 18        (2) keeping detailed documentation of the methods used 19    to: 20            (A) manage covered products; and 21            (B) track and document the fate of covered 22        products from collection through final disposition 23        within this State and outside this State; 24        (3) performance audits and inspections; 25        (4) compliance with worker health and safety 26    requirements; and   SB1394- 7 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1        (5) maintenance of adequate environmental liability 2    insurance and financial assurances for a stewardship 3    organization and contractors working for the stewardship 4    organization. 5    "Final disposition" means the point beyond which no 6further processing takes place and the covered product has 7been either transformed for direct use as a feedstock in 8producing new products, discarded in a manner approved by the 9Agency, processed for energy recovery in permitted facilities, 10or incinerated without energy recovery in permitted 11facilities. 12    "Manufacturer" means a person who: 13        (1) manufactures or manufactured a covered product 14    under its own brand or label for sale in the State; 15        (2) sells in the State under its own brand or label a 16    covered product produced by another supplier; 17        (3) owns a brand that it licenses or licensed to 18    another person for use on a covered product sold in the 19    State; 20        (4) imports a covered product manufactured by a person 21    without a presence in the United States into the United 22    States for sale in the United States; 23        (5) manufactures a covered product for sale in the 24    State without affixing a brand name; or 25        (6) is the manufacturer of a covered product sold, 26    offered for sale, or distributed in or into this State, as   SB1394- 8 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    defined in this Section, except if another party has 2    contractually accepted responsibility as a responsible 3    manufacturer and has joined a stewardship organization as 4    the manufacturer for that covered product. 5    "Manufacturer" does not include a person who 6manufacturers, sells, licenses, or imports less than 7$5,000,000 of covered products in or into the United States in 8a program year and provides documentation on an annual basis 9with a stewardship organization that it is not a manufacturer 10as defined by this Act. 11    "Orphan covered product" means a covered product for which 12no manufacturer can be identified. 13    "Person" has the meaning given to that term in Section 143.315 of the Environmental Protection Act. 15    "Premium collection service" means collection service 16provided at a location that is not a collection site such as 17at-home pickup service, including curbside pickup service. 18    "Program year" means a calendar year. The first program 19year is 2027. 20    "Retailer" means a person who first sells, through any 21means, including a sales outlet, catalog, the Internet, or 22electronic means, a covered product to a customer for 23residential use or any permanent establishment where 24merchandise is displayed, held, stored, or offered for sale to 25the public. 26    "Stewardship organization" means a manufacturer that   SB1394- 9 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1directly implements a stewardship program required under this 2Act, a corporation designated by a manufacturer or group of 3manufacturers to implement a stewardship program under this 4Act, or a nonprofit organization designated by a manufacturer 5or group of manufacturers to implement a stewardship program 6under this Act. 7    "Stewardship plan" means a plan developed by a 8manufacturer or a stewardship organization that is consistent 9with this Act and approved by the Agency. "Stewardship 10program" means a program implemented by a stewardship 11organization consistent with this Act and the approved 12stewardship plan. 13    "Transfer facility" has the meaning given to that term in 1435 Ill. Adm. Code 723.112. 15    "Transfer station" has the meaning given to that term in 16Section 3.500 of the Environmental Protection Act. 17    "Transportation cost" means the cost associated with 18loading and shipping covered products to a transfer station, 19transfer facility, or final disposition location. 20    Section 15. Requirement that manufacturers implement a 21stewardship program.22    (a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a manufacturer selling, 23making available for sale, or distributing covered products in 24or into the State of Illinois shall participate in the 25approved stewardship plan.   SB1394- 10 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, no manufacturer shall sell 2covered products covered by this Act in or into the State who 3does not participate in a stewardship organization and 4stewardship plan. 5    (c) Beginning January 1, 2027, no manufacturer shall sell 6covered products covered by this Act unless the product is 7labeled with a brand and the original manufacturer is 8identified on the label. 9    Section 20. Manufacturer obligations.10    (a) A manufacturer shall establish, fund, and implement a 11stewardship program individually or collectively as part of a 12stewardship organization. The proportion of funding by 13manufacturers shall be: 14        (1) 100% of the collection cost for all collection 15    sites in an approved stewardship program; and 16        (2) 50% of the transportation cost and disposal cost 17    for covered products and orphan covered products in 18    program year 2027, 60% in 2028, 70% in 2029, 80% in 2030 19    and thereafter manufacturers shall be responsible for 90% 20    of the transportation cost and disposal cost for covered 21    products and orphan covered products unless the Agency is 22    not appropriated funding by the State in which case 23    manufacturers shall be responsible for 100% of the 24    transportation cost and disposal cost; and 25        (3) 100% of the collection cost, transportation cost,   SB1394- 11 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    and disposal cost for collection sites operated by the 2    stewardship organization. 3    (b) If there is more than one stewardship organization 4representing manufacturers, manufacturers shall jointly submit 5a single stewardship plan that meets the requirements of 6Section 40 and a single annual report that meets the 7requirements of Section 55. 8    (c) If there is more than one stewardship organization, 9manufacturers shall designate one stewardship organization to 10enter into mutual agreements with collection sites. 11    (d) Each stewardship organization shall equitably allocate 12stewardship program costs to manufacturers participating in 13the stewardship program. The method of cost allocation shall 14be included in the stewardship plan required under Section 40. 15    (e) A manufacturer, stewardship organization, or retailer 16shall not charge: 17        (1) a specific point-of-sale fee to a covered entity 18    to recoup the costs of the stewardship program; or 19        (2) a specific fee at the time the covered products 20    are collected from a covered entity. 21    (f) A manufacturer or stewardship organization shall not 22charge a fee to any person collecting covered products under 23this Act. 24    (g) Beginning January 1, 2027, units of local government 25and any person with a permanent collection site, an Agency 26sponsored one-day collection site, or a contractually   SB1394- 12 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1obligated one-day collection site shall be included in the 2stewardship organization's plan and stewardship program and 3shall be counted toward complying with the collection 4requirements in Section 50. A stewardship organization must 5reimburse collection sites for collection costs incurred due 6to serving as a collection site for a stewardship program. A 7stewardship organization must establish a mutual agreement 8with each collection site and provide reimbursement for 9collection costs no less frequently than every 3 months. 10    (h) A stewardship organization must reimburse the Agency's 11contractor for transportation costs and disposal costs 12incurred by the Agency's contractor for the transportation 13cost and disposal cost incurred by the collection sites. A 14stewardship organization must establish a mutual agreement 15with the Agency and provide reimbursement to the Agency's 16contractor in compliance with the Agency's contract with its 17contractor. 18    (i) A stewardship organization must accept and fund the 19collection, transportation, and disposal costs associated with 20orphan covered products. 21    (j) A stewardship organization is not responsible for 22funding the cost associated with premium collection service. 23    Section 25. Manufacturer registration.24    (a) By April 1, 2026, and by April 1 of each year 25thereafter for the upcoming program year, beginning with   SB1394- 13 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1program year 2027, each manufacturer who sells covered 2products in the State must register with a stewardship 3organization by submitting to the stewardship organization a 4list of all the brands under which the manufacturer sells or 5offers for sale in the State. Each stewardship organization 6shall subsequently register with the Agency, on a form 7prescribed by the Agency, and provide a list of all the brands 8and manufacturers covered by the stewardship organization. 9    (b) By January 1, 2027, each stewardship organization 10shall post on the single, coordinated website, as required by 11Section 40, a list of all registered manufacturers and 12associated brands. 13    (c) Beginning in program year 2027, a manufacturer whose 14covered products are sold or offered for sale in this State for 15the first time on or after April 1 of the program year must 16register with a stewardship organization within 30 days after 17the date the covered products are first sold or offered for 18sale in the State. The stewardship organization must provide 19the Agency the name of the manufacturer and its brand or 20brands, in writing, within 30 days of the date the 21manufacturer registered with the stewardship organization. 22    (d) Beginning in program year 2027, no manufacturer may 23sell or offer to sell a covered product in this State unless 24the manufacturer is registered and operates a stewardship 25program either individually or as part of a stewardship 26organization.   SB1394- 14 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    Section 30. Role of retailers.2    (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, a retailer may not sell, offer 3for sale, distribute, or otherwise make available for sale a 4covered product unless the manufacturer of the covered product 5is identified as a participant in a stewardship organization 6whose stewardship plan has been approved by the Agency. 7    (b) A retailer is not in violation of the requirements of 8subsection (a) of this Section if the website made available 9under subsection (b) of Section 25 lists the manufacturer as a 10participant in a stewardship organization whose stewardship 11plan has been approved by the Agency. 12    (c) A retailer selling or offering covered products for 13sale in the State shall provide information to covered 14entities, provided by the stewardship organization, regarding 15available end-of-life management options for covered products. 16The information that a stewardship organization must make 17available to retailers for use by retailers must include, but 18is not limited to, in-store signage, written materials, and 19other promotional materials that retailers may use to inform 20customers of the available end-of-life management options for 21covered products. 22    Section 35. Role of collection sites.23    (a) Collection sites must keep accurate records to 24demonstrate collection costs associated with the stewardship   SB1394- 15 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1program. 2    (b) Collection sites must provide data as required by a 3stewardship organization to comply with the requirements of 4Section 55. 5    Section 40. Stewardship plan components.6    (a) By June 1, 2026, each stewardship organization must 7coordinate and submit to the Agency for approval a single 8stewardship plan for covered products. The Agency shall review 9and approve a plan based on whether it: 10        (1) lists each manufacturer and brand of covered 11    products registered with each stewardship organization, 12    including manufacturers who have contractually accepted 13    responsibility as a manufacturer in accordance with 14    paragraph (6) of the definition of "manufacturer" in this 15    Act; 16        (2) provides for free, convenient, and accessible 17    statewide access for the collection of covered products 18    from covered entities in the State; 19        (3) describes how retailers will be made aware of 20    their obligation to sell only covered products from 21    manufacturers participating in an approved stewardship 22    plan; 23        (4) describes the education and communications 24    strategy being implemented to promote participation in the 25    stewardship program by covered entities and provides the   SB1394- 16 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    information necessary for effective participation in the 2    stewardship program, including the development of a single 3    website and providing information to retailers under 4    subsection (c) of Section 30 of this Act; 5        (5) describes the information to be provided on a 6    single website, including, but not limited to, information 7    about collection site locations, including a map showing 8    the locations of all collection sites, hours of operation, 9    contact information, and a list of acceptable covered 10    products and nonacceptable items; 11        (6) describes efforts by manufacturers to reduce the 12    environmental health and safety impacts of covered 13    products; 14        (7) provides for the environmentally sound management 15    of covered products; 16        (8) provides the name, location and permit status of 17    final disposition facilities where covered products will 18    be transported and the covered products managed by each 19    final disposition facility; 20        (9) demonstrates compliance with the collection 21    convenience standard requirements in Section 50; 22        (10) describes how data regarding the covered products 23    collected in a program year will be reported, including 24    independent data for each collection site regarding the 25    amount of covered products collected and the number of 26    covered entities that participated in the stewardship   SB1394- 17 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    program; 2        (11) describes how a stewardship organization will 3    incorporate existing permanent collection sites and 4    one-day collection sites into the stewardship program; 5        (12) describes the method to establish and administer 6    a means for fully funding the stewardship program in a 7    manner that equitably distributes the stewardship 8    program's costs among the manufacturers that are part of 9    each stewardship organization. For manufacturers that 10    choose to meet the requirements of this Act individually, 11    without joining a stewardship organization, the plan must 12    describe the proposed method to establish and administer a 13    means for fully funding the stewardship program; and 14        (13) describes efforts that will be made to ensure 15    that areas designated as environmental justice communities 16    will have convenient access to collection sites. 17    (b) A stewardship organization must submit a new 18stewardship plan to the Agency for approval no less than every 195 years. 20    (c) A stewardship organization must provide plan 21amendments to the Agency for approval when proposing changes 22to the approved stewardship plan or when requested by the 23Agency due to deficiencies in the stewardship program being 24implemented under the stewardship plan in effect. 25    Section 45. Stewardship plan approval.  SB1394- 18 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    (a) The Agency shall approve the proposed stewardship plan 2if each manufacturer participating in the stewardship plan has 3registered under Section 25 and the stewardship plan 4demonstrates compliance with the requirements of Section 40. 5    (b) Within 90 days after receiving the stewardship plan, 6the Agency shall either approve, reject, or approve with 7modification the stewardship plan in writing for each 8stewardship organization. If the Agency rejects the 9stewardship plan, it shall provide the reason for the 10rejection in the written notification to the stewardship 11organization. 12    (c) No later than 60 days after receipt of a notice of 13rejection under subsection (b) of this Section, a revised 14stewardship plan must be submitted to the Agency. Within 30 15days after receipt of the revised stewardship plan, the Agency 16shall either approve or reject the revised stewardship plan in 17writing for the stewardship organization. 18    (d) After approval, manufacturers must, either 19individually or collectively as a stewardship organization, 20initiate operation of the stewardship program outlined in the 21stewardship plan no later than January 1, 2027. 22    Section 50. Collection convenience standard requirements.23    (a) A stewardship organization implementing a stewardship 24plan must provide for the collection of all covered products 25to all covered entities on a free, continuous, and statewide   SB1394- 19 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1basis. If there is more than one stewardship organization, 2those stewardship organizations may coordinate and meet the 3requirements of this Section jointly. 4    (b) For covered products, by the beginning of program year 52027, statewide collection requirements must include all 6permanent collection sites permitted to collect covered 7products as of January 1, 2027, all Agency sponsored one-day 8collection sites under which the Agency has an agreement to 9conduct one-day events, and all one-day collection sites that 10are contractually obligated by any person. 11    (c) For covered products, statewide collection 12requirements by the beginning of program year 2029 must 13include: 14        (1) at least one collection site that is a permanent 15    collection site for covered products within a 15-mile 16    radius for at least 60% of State residents; and 17        (2) at least one collection site that is a one-day 18    collection site for covered products within a 25-mile 19    radius for at least an additional 20% of State residents. 20    (d) For covered products, statewide collection 21requirements by the beginning of program year 2030 must 22include: 23        (1) at least one collection site that is a permanent 24    collection site for covered products within a 15-mile 25    radius for at least 70% of State residents; and 26        (2) at least one collection site that is a one-day   SB1394- 20 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    collection site for covered products within a 25-mile 2    radius for at least 25% of State residents. 3    (e) Collection convenience shall be for at least the 4number of hours allowed by the site's Agency permit for a 5permanent collection site. Collection convenience for a 6one-day collection site shall be at least once per year or as 7contractually obligated and shall be at least 6 hours in 8length per collection event. 9    Section 55. Reporting requirements.10    (a) By June 1, 2028, and each June 1st thereafter, each 11stewardship organization must coordinate and submit a single 12annual report to the Agency covering the preceding program 13year and post the annual report on its website. The report must 14include the following: 15        (1) an independent financial assessment of the 16    stewardship program implemented by each stewardship 17    organization, including a breakdown of the program's 18    expenses, including, but not limited to, collection cost, 19    disposal cost, transportation cost, and administrative 20    cost; 21        (2) a summary financial statement documenting the 22    financing of each stewardship organization's program and 23    an analysis of program costs and expenditures. A 24    stewardship organization implementing similar programs in 25    other states may submit a financial statement, including   SB1394- 21 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    all other covered states, if the statement breaks out 2    financial information pertinent to Illinois; 3        (3) a breakdown of the type and manifested weight of 4    covered products collected by the stewardship program for 5    each collection site and the number of covered entities 6    who brought covered products to each collection site; 7        (4) the name and address of each collection site used 8    to collect covered products, including an up-to-date map 9    indicating the location of all collection sites; 10        (5) a breakdown of the final disposition of the 11    covered products including a list of the facilities used 12    in the disposition of the covered products that includes 13    the name and geographic location of the facilities and any 14    violations of environmental laws and regulations over the 15    previous 3 years at each facility; 16        (6) an assessment of whether the collection 17    convenience standard requirements in Section 50 have been 18    met or not; 19        (7) a description of the education and communication 20    efforts, including examples of marketing materials and 21    efforts used, including an assessment of the success of 22    the educational efforts; and 23        (8) any recommendations for changes to the stewardship 24    program. 25    (b) Proprietary information submitted to the Agency under 26this Act is exempted from disclosure as provided under   SB1394- 22 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1paragraphs (g) and (mm) of subsection (1) of Section 7 of the 2Freedom of Information Act. 3    (c) Within 30 days after Agency approval of the annual 4report, the annual report shall be posted to the program 5website required under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of 6Section 40. 7    Section 60. Fee and Agency role.8    (a) By July 1, 2026, and by July 1 of each year thereafter, 9a stewardship organization shall pay to the Agency an annual 10fee of $200,000. If there is more than one stewardship 11organization, the stewardship organizations shall equitably 12split the annual fee of $200,000. The fee shall cover the 13Agency's full costs of implementing, administering, and 14enforcing this Act. The annual fee shall be deposited into the 15Solid Waste Management Fund to be used for costs associated 16with the administration of this Act. 17    (b) The responsibilities of the Agency in implementing, 18administering and enforcing this Act include: 19        (1) reviewing submitted stewardship plans and plan 20    amendments and making determinations as to whether to 21    approve the plan or plan amendment; 22        (2) reviewing annual reports submitted under Section 23    55 within 90 days after submission to ensure compliance 24    with that Section; 25        (3) maintaining a link on its website to the single   SB1394- 23 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1    website required under paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of 2    Section 40; 3        (4) maintaining the list of registered manufacturers 4    on its website; and 5        (5) providing technical assistance to producers, 6    retailers and collection sites related to the requirements 7    of this Act. 8    Section 65. Antitrust immunity. The activities authorized 9by this Act require collaboration among the covered 10manufacturers and the collection sites. These activities will 11enable safe and secure collection, transportation, and 12disposal of covered products in Illinois and are, therefore, 13in the best interest of the public. The benefits of 14collaboration, together with active State supervision, 15outweigh potential adverse impacts. Therefore, the General 16Assembly intends to exempt State antitrust laws and provide 17immunity through the state action doctrine from federal 18antitrust laws, activities that are undertaken under this Act 19that might otherwise be constrained by such laws. The General 20Assembly does not intend to authorize any person or entity to 21engage in activities not provided for by this Act, and the 22General Assembly neither exempts nor provides immunity for 23such activities. 24    Section 70. Rulemaking authority. The Agency may adopt   SB1394- 24 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1rules to implement this Act. 2    Section 75. Penalties and civil actions.3    (a) Any person who violates any provision of this Act is 4liable for a civil penalty of $7,000 per violation, except 5that failure to pay a fee under this Act shall cause the person 6who fails to pay the fee to be liable for a civil penalty that 7is double the applicable fee. 8    (b) The penalties provided in this Section may be 9recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the People 10of the State of Illinois by the State's Attorney of the county 11in which the violation occurred or by the Attorney General. 12Any penalties collected under this Section in an action in 13which the Attorney General has prevailed shall be deposited 14into the Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in 15accordance with the provisions of the Environmental Protection 16Trust Fund Act. 17    (c) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of a 18county in which a violation occurs may institute a civil 19action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 20restrain violations of this Act or to require such actions as 21may be necessary to address violations of this Act. 22    (d) The penalties and injunctions provided in this Act are 23in addition to any penalties, injunctions, or other relief 24provided under any other State law. Nothing in this Act bars a 25cause of action by the State for any other penalty,   SB1394- 25 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1injunction, or other relief provided by any other law. 2    (e) Any person who makes a false, fictitious, or 3fraudulent material statement, orally or in writing, to the 4Agency, related to or required by this Act or any rule adopted 5under this Act commits a Class 4 felony, and each such 6statement or writing shall be considered a separate Class 4 7felony. A person who, after being convicted under this 8subsection, violates this subsection a second or subsequent 9time commits a Class 3 felony. 10    Section 80. Collection of covered products using premium 11collection service. Nothing in this Act shall prevent or 12prohibit a person from offering or performing a fee-based, 13household collection of covered products provided such 14person's premium collection services must be performed in 15compliance with all applicable federal, State, and local laws 16and requirements, including, but not limited to, all 17applicable U.S. Department of Transportation laws and 18regulations, and all applicable provisions of the 19Environmental Protection Act. Such person collecting covered 20products may make available to the stewardship organization 21some or all of the covered products collected using premium 22collection service at no expense. After consolidation of some 23or all of the covered products at the person's facilities, the 24transport to and processing of such covered products by the 25stewardship organization's processors of some or all of the   SB1394- 26 -LRB104 06517 BDA 16553 b1covered products shall be at the stewardship organization's 2expense. The stewardship organization may count the households 3serviced by premium collection service toward the collection 4and convenience standard requirements in Section 50 of this 5Act. 6    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 7severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.